Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Acquisition of Land for Industrial Development

152.810.
Definitions for KRS 152.820 to 152.930. [Renumbered.]

152.820.
Purpose. [Renumbered.]

152.830.
Establishment of local industrial development authority. [Renumbered.]

152.840.
Functions of authority. [Renumbered.]

152.850.
Limitations on condemnation powers. [Renumbered.]

152.860.
Membership of authority. [Renumbered.]

152.870.
Withdrawal by governmental unit — Dissolution of authority. [Renumbered.]

152.880.
Quorum — Effect of tie vote. [Renumbered.]

152.890.
Authority officers, employees — Expenses of members. [Renumbered.]

152.900.
Authority’s power to receive appropriations, finance by borrowing or issuance of revenue bonds. [Renumbered.]

152.910.
Title to property — Authority’s property, revenues are tax-exempt. [Renumbered.]

152.920.
Declaration of public purpose. [Renumbered.]

152.930.
Citation. [Renumbered.]